Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
ARTICLE 62
HIGH-FIDELITY WRAPAROUND SERVICES
FOR CHILDREN AND YOUTH

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 19-195, see section 1 of chapter 190, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

Section

27-62-101. Definitions.

As used in this article 62, unless the context otherwise requires:

"At risk of out-of-home placement" means a child or youth who is eligible for medical assistance pursuant to articles 4, 5, and 6 of title 25.5 and the child or youth:

Has been diagnosed as having a mental health disorder, as defined in section 27-65-102, or a behavioral health disorder; and

May require a level of care that is provided in a residential child care facility, inpatient psychiatric hospital, or other intensive care setting outside of the child's or youth's home. "At risk of out-of-home placement" includes a child or youth who:

Is entering the division of youth services; or

Is at risk of child welfare involvement.

(1.5) "Behavioral health administration" or "BHA" means the behavioral health administration established in section 27-50-102.

"Behavioral health disorder" means a substance use disorder, mental health disorder, or one or more substantial disorders of the cognitive, volitional, or emotional processes that grossly impair judgment or capacity to recognize reality or to control behavior, including serious emotional disturbances. "Behavioral health disorder" also includes those mental health disorders listed in the most recent versions of the diagnostic statistical manual of mental health disorders, the diagnostic classification of mental health and developmental disorders of infancy and early childhood, and the international statistical classification of diseases and related health problems.

"Child and youth" means a person who is twenty-six years of age or younger.

(3.5) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the behavioral health administration.

"Managed care entity" means an entity that enters into a contract to provide services in the statewide managed care system pursuant to articles 4, 5, and 6 of title 25.5.

"Mental health professional" means an individual licensed as a mental health professional pursuant to article 245 of title 12 or a professional person, as defined in section 27-65-102 (27).

"Out-of-home placement" means a child or youth who is eligible for medical assistance pursuant to articles 4, 5, and 6 of title 25.5 and the child or youth:

Has been diagnosed as having a mental health disorder, as defined in section 27-65-102, or a behavioral health disorder; and

May require a level of care that is provided in a residential child care facility, inpatient psychiatric hospital, or other intensive care setting outside of the child's or youth's home. "Out-of-home placement" includes a child or youth who:

Has entered the division of youth services; or

Is at risk of child welfare involvement.

"Standardized assessment tool" means a multipurpose instrument that facilitates the link between assessment and level of care and individualized service planning, facilitates quality improvement activities, and allows for monitoring of outcomes of services.

Repealed.

"Wraparound" means a high-fidelity, individualized, family-centered, strengths-based, and intensive care planning and management process used in the delivery of behavioral health services for a child or youth with a behavioral health disorder, commonly utilized as part of the system of care framework.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added, (SB 19-195), ch. 190, p. 2101, § 4, effective August 2.

L. 2022:

(1.5) and (3.5) added and (8) repealed, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1534, § 104, effective July 1; (1)(a), (5), and (6)(a) amended, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3235, § 42, effective August 10.

27-62-102. High-fidelity wraparound services for children and youth - interagency coordination - reporting.

Pursuant to section 25.5-5-803 (4), the BHA shall work collaboratively with the department of health care policy and financing, counties, and other relevant departments, as appropriate, to develop and oversee wraparound services for children and youth at risk of out-of-home placement or in an out-of-home placement. As part of routine collaboration, the BHA shall assist the department of health care policy and financing in developing a model of sustainable funding for wraparound services. The BHA and the department of health care policy and financing shall monitor and report the annual cost savings associated with eligible children and youth receiving wraparound services to the public through the annual hearing, pursuant to the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act", part 2 of article 7 of title 2.

Subject to available appropriations, two full-time staff persons shall be appointed by the commissioner to support and facilitate interagency coordination pursuant to this article 62, part 8 of article 5 of title 25.5, and any other related interagency behavioral health efforts as determined by the commissioner.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added, (SB 19-195), ch. 190, p. 2103, § 4, effective August 2.

L. 2020:

(2) amended, (HB 20-1384), ch. 172, p. 790, § 4, effective June 29.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1534, § 105, effective July 1.

27-62-103. Standardized assessment tool - standardized screening tools - interagency coordination - single referral and entry point.

Standardized assessment tool. Subject to available appropriations, the BHA shall select a single standardized assessment tool to facilitate identification of behavioral health issues and other related needs in children and youth and to develop a plan to implement the tool for programmatic utilization. The BHA shall consult with the department of health care policy and financing, managed care entities, counties, stakeholders, and other relevant departments, as appropriate, prior to selecting the tool.

Standardized screening tools. Subject to available appropriations, the BHA shall select developmentally appropriate and culturally competent statewide behavioral health standardized screening tools for primary care providers serving children, youth, and caregivers in the perinatal period, including postpartum women. The BHA and the department of human services may make the tools available electronically for health-care professionals and the public. Prior to the adoption of the standardized assessment tool described in subsection (1) of this section, and the standardized screening tools described in this subsection (2), the BHA shall lead a public consultation process involving relevant stakeholders, including health-care professionals and managed care entities, with input from the department of health care policy and financing, the department of public health and environment, and the division of insurance.

Single statewide referral and entry point. Subject to available appropriations, the BHA, in conjunction with the department of health care policy and financing, the department of public health and environment, and other relevant departments and counties, as necessary, shall develop a plan for establishing a single statewide referral and entry point for children and youth who have a positive behavioral health screening or whose needs are identified through a standardized assessment. In developing the single statewide referral and entry point plan, the BHA shall seek input from relevant stakeholders, including counties, managed care entities participating in the statewide managed care system, families of children and youth with behavioral health disorders, communities that have previously implemented wraparound services, mental health professionals, and other relevant departments.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added, (SB 19-195), ch. 190, p. 2103, § 4, effective August 2.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (HB 20-1384), ch. 172, p. 791, § 5, effective June 29.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1534, § 106, effective July 1.